Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1608
Excess insurance, defined.

Excess insurance shall mean (1) aggregate insurance, (2) specific insurance, or (3) insurance in excess of a deductible, of which the plan sponsor assumes some or all of the risk for the deductible, purchased from an insurer.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 8.